Washington statutes.
RCW 36.900.030

Invalidity of part of title not to affect remainder.

If any provision of this title, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the title, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.98.030. Formerly RCW 36.98.030.]

NOTES:

Severability—1967 ex.s. c 144: "If any provision of this 1967 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected." [ 1967 ex.s. c 144 s 21.]